Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB1064.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1809. (1) All of the following apply to the ownership and management of a funeral establishment: (a) A funeral establishment shall must be managed by an individual who is the holder of a license for the practice of mortuary science. The manager shall ensure that the funeral establishment complies with all applicable laws. (b) A funeral establishment shall notify the department, in writing, of the name of the individual appointed as the manager of the funeral establishment and conspicuously display the name of the manager at the entrance of the funeral establishment. (c) A manager of a funeral establishment shall not reside more than 75 miles from that funeral establishment. (d) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2), an individual shall not manage more than 1 funeral establishment. (e) If a new manager is appointed for a funeral establishment, the funeral establishment shall notify the department, in writing, of the name of the new manager not more later than 30 days after the date of his or her the new manager's appointment. (2) The director shall receive and approve or deny requests for waivers to that allow an individual to act as the manager of 2 funeral establishments under this subsection. All of the following apply to a request for a waiver under this subsection: (a) The prospective manager shall request the waiver. The request must include the following: (i) The prospective manager's name and mortuary science license number. (ii) The name and license number of each funeral establishment affected. (iii) Documentation supporting the existence of the factors listed in subdivision (b). (b) The director shall not grant a waiver under this subsection unless all of the following factors are met: (i) The funeral establishments are located in the same county or contiguous counties. (ii) The population density of the county in which each of the funeral establishments is located is less than the population density for this state, based on data from the most recent decennial census. (iii) The funeral establishments are located within 90 miles of each other. (c) If the waiver is denied, the director shall send a written notice of the denial and the reasons for denial to the individual who requested the waiver. The individual may appeal the denial to the board in the manner provided for in under section 515. (3) An individual whose license is revoked under this article shall not own or manage, either directly or indirectly, or hold an interest in, a funeral establishment. This subsection does not prohibit an individual whose license is revoked from leasing property owned by the individual for use as a funeral establishment if the individual does not participate in the control or profit of the funeral establishment, other than as a lessor of the premises for a fixed rental that is not dependent on earnings. (4) A branch establishment shall must be managed by an individual who is the holder of a license for the practice of mortuary science. The manager shall ensure that the branch establishment complies with all applicable laws. (5) The department and the board may inspect the premises of any location where funeral directing is conducted, embalming is practiced, or an applicant intends to engage in the practice of mortuary science. (6) A funeral establishment shall must contain a all of the following: (a) A preparation room equipped with tile, cement, or composition floor, and necessary drainage and ventilation. , and contain each (b) Each necessary instrument or supply for the preparation and embalming of a dead human body for burial, transportation, or other disposition. (c) Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision and subject to subsection (7), a refrigeration unit. The funeral establishment shall ensure that the refrigeration unit required under this subdivision has the capacity to provide a space for each dead human body housed in the funeral establishment. This subdivision does not apply to a funeral establishment if either of the following conditions apply: (i) The funeral establishment has a contract with a person that owns a facility that is located within 50 miles of the funeral establishment and that contains a refrigeration unit that is suitable for storing dead human bodies. The contract must provide that the person will house, in the facility's refrigeration unit at an air temperature not to exceed 40 degrees Fahrenheit, dead human bodies transported from the funeral establishment. The facility's refrigeration unit must have the capacity to house each dead human body transported from the funeral establishment. (ii) The funeral establishment owns or operates a cemetery or crematory facility that is located within 50 miles of the funeral establishment and that contains a refrigeration unit that is suitable for storing dead human bodies. The funeral establishment shall ensure that the dead human bodies be transported to the funeral establishment's cemetery or crematory facility and stored in the cemetery or crematory facility's refrigeration unit at an air temperature not to exceed 40 degrees Fahrenheit. As used in this subdivision, "crematory facility" means that term as defined in section 1880. (7) Not later than 24 hours after a dead human body arrives at a funeral establishment, the funeral establishment shall do 1 of the following: (a) Embalm the dead human body. (b) House the dead human body in a refrigeration unit described in subsection (6)(c) at an air temperature not to exceed 40 degrees Fahrenheit. (8) (7) A branch establishment is subject to all of the requirements or rules relating that relate to a funeral establishment. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) Senate Bill No. 1060. (b) Senate Bill No. 1061.